Vermont statutes. Title 29 Public Property and Supplies
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 511.
Hearings conducted by examiners.

The Board may provide for the appointment of one or more examiners to conduct hearings with respect to any matter properly coming before the Board and to make reports and recommendations to the Board with respect thereto. The Board shall provide for compensation to be paid for services performed as an examiner.

The Board shall adopt rules with regard to hearings to be conducted before examiners. The rules also shall provide procedures for rehearing before the Board and times within which requests for a rehearing must be made. Upon request of an interested party, the Board shall hold a rehearing.

The Board may enter orders based upon the reports and recommendations of its examiners.

If an order grants the request of an applicant and no objection has been made or filed before or during the hearing before the examiner, the order shall be effective immediately.

If an order denies the request of the applicant, in whole or in part, or if a timely protest to the granting of an application is made or filed, the order shall not become effective if a request for rehearing is made; and shall become effective only when either all interested parties have waived their right to rehearing or the time to request a rehearing has expired.

After an order based on a hearing before an examiner has become effective, it shall have the same force and effect as if the hearing had been conducted before the Board. If a timely request for rehearing is made, the Board may deny rehearing or affirm, revoke, or modify the order.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 512.
Hearings conducted by the Board.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter or any rule of the Board, any hearing on any matter or proceeding may be held before the Board if the Board desires to hear the matter; or if the matter is initiated on the motion of the Board and is for the purpose of enforcing, amending, establishing, or revoking a statewide rule, regulation, or order; or if any person who may be affected by the matter or proceeding files with the Board, more than 10 days prior to the date set for the hearing, a written objection to the hearing before an examiner.

The parties shall have the right to present additional testimony and documentary evidence at any rehearing.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 513.
Subpoena.

In any matter properly before it, the Board may compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of documentary evidence. A party shall be entitled to the issuance of subpoenas by making a written request. In all other respects, the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure shall apply to the proceedings before the Board.

A person aggrieved by a subpoena issued by the Board may petition a Superior judge, who may issue any order authorized in civil cases to protect a party from improper discovery.

A person who disobeys a proper subpoena of the Board or refuses to take an oath or affirmation properly required by the Board shall be liable to the penalty and attachment provided in Title 12 for disobeying a judicial subpoena.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 514.
Appeal.

An appeal from a decision of the Board shall be to the Supreme Court.
The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act shall apply to the extent they are not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 515.
Personnel.

Within the limits of legislative authorizations of positions and appropriations of funds, the Board may employ an executive officer and other personnel as it finds necessary in carrying out its duties, including engineering, technical, and other consultants.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 516.
Governmental cooperation.

Other departments and agencies of State government shall cooperate with the Board and, as mutually agreeable, make available at cost data, facilities, and personnel as may be needed to assist the Board in carrying out its duties and functions. Geological services for the Board shall be provided by or in cooperation with the State Geologist.

The Board, within the scope of its jurisdiction and authorization, may cooperate with agencies of the federal government or other states to protect the interests of the State in its oil and gas resources.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.

§ 517.
Standards for rulemaking.

Rulemaking power granted by this chapter shall be exercised in the manner provided by the Vermont Administrative Procedure Act.

Rules adopted under this chapter shall be consistent with the purposes of this chapter and within the intent of the Legislature.

Rules adopted under this chapter concerning administrative procedures, such as rules of evidence during hearings, shall be in accordance with due process of law.

The power under this chapter to establish fees by rule shall be construed to authorize only fees which are approximately sufficient to cover the costs associated with the program or part of the program intended to be financed by the fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1981, No. 240

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. April 28, 1982.